Hawaii statutes.
§174C-42 Notice; public hearing required.
When a recommendation for designation of a water management area has been
accepted, the commission shall hold a public hearing at a location in the
vicinity of the area proposed for designation and give public notice of the
hearing setting forth:

(1) A description of the land area proposed to be
designated in terms of appropriate legal subdivisions and tax map keys;

(2) The purpose of the public hearing; and

(3) The time, date, and place of the public hearing where
written or oral testimony may be submitted and heard.

The notice shall be given once each week for three
successive weeks in the appropriate county and the last notice shall be not
less than ten days nor more than thirty days before the date set for the
hearing. The notice of public hearing shall be considered as sufficient notice
to all landowners and water users who might be affected by the proposed
designation. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 2, §43]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next